Oklahoma, session 2025, SB243.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5-300 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:



Req. No. 161 Page 1


A. The State Department of Education shall establish and


maintain the School Innovation Grant Program to provide grants to


school districts in this state to implement educational innovations.


B. 1. A school district seeking to participate in the School


Innovation Grant Program shall apply to the State Department of


Education for a one-time grant in the manner and on a form


prescribed by the Department.


2. The application shall include:


a. the innovation the school district seeks to implement,


b. the grant amount requested to purchase curriculum,


equipment, instructional technology, or other


necessary items to implement the innovation, and


c. the metrics by which the school district proposes to


measure the success or failure of the innovation.


3. Grant applications shall be reviewed on a first-come, first-


served basis. After an initial review, representatives of the State


Department of Education shall meet with representatives of an


applying school district to discuss the proposed innovation.


Department representatives shall make grant recommendations to the


State Board of Education, which shall approve or disapprove the


grant applications.


4. Innovation grants shall be provided without any limitation


other than the amount of funds available in the School Innovation



Req. No. 161 Page 2


Revolving Fund created in Section 2 of this act and the number of


school districts that apply.


C. Of the funds appropriated to the School Innovation


Revolving Fund created in Section 2 of this act:


1. Forty percent (40%) of the funds shall be provided to


applying school districts with an average daily membership (ADM) of


fewer than one thousand (1,000) students;


2. Thirty percent (30%) of the funds shall be provided to


applying school districts with an ADM of one thousand (1,000)


students or more but fewer than two thousand five hundred (2,500)


students; and


3. Thirty percent (30%) of the funds shall be provided to


applying school districts with an ADM of two thousand five hundred


(2,500) students or more.


D. One year after implementation of the School Innovation Grant


Program, the State Department of Education shall collect information


from school districts that receive grants pursuant to this section.


The Department shall electronically submit a report to the Governor,


the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the


House of Representatives that includes the school district grant


recipients, the amount of grant funds allocated to each recipient,


the innovation that each recipient implemented, and the impact the


innovation had on the school district recipient, its students, and


its staff.

Req. No. 161 Page 3


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5-301 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund


for the State Board of Education to be designated the “School


Innovation Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing fund,


not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of all


monies received by the State Board of Education from legislative


appropriations provided for the purpose of implementing the School


Innovation Grant Program created in Section 1 of this act. All


monies accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby appropriated


and may be budgeted and expended by the State Board of Education for


the purpose provided for in this section. Expenditures from the


fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer


against claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the


Office of Management and Enterprise Services for approval and


payment.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-161 EB 12/30/2024 5:26:15 PM

Req. No. 161 Page 4